Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 17. Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program

§ 1701.
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

The State of Vermont may participate in the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) pursuant to 7 U.S.C. chapter 51. The purpose of SNAP is to alleviate hunger and malnutrition among households with low income by increasing their food purchasing power and access to nutritious, safe food.

An individual domiciled in Vermont shall be exempt from the disqualification provided for in

21 U.S.C. § 862a

.

The Commissioner may adopt, amend, or repeal rules governing the operation of the Program in the State pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

As used in this chapter, “Commissioner” means the Commissioner for Children and Families and “Department” means the Department for Children and Families.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 2; amended

1969, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), eff. Feb. 16, 1970;

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 14, 1974;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 91, 140;

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.322;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. May 20, 2014;

2017, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1702.
Payment error rate report.

On or before January 1 of the year following any federal fiscal year in which the State of Vermont receives a federal sanction for a payment error rate greater than the federal threshold in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), the Department for Children and Families shall report to the Senate Committee on Appropriations regarding:

the number of households that received SNAP benefits and were discovered to have an overpayment or underpayment in the sanction year due to agency error, including the average amount of the overpayments and underpayments and the total amount of each; and

the Department’s specific plans for sanction reinvestment to improve its error rate for the next federal fiscal year and prevent sanction in the future.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § E.316; amended

2017, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 1703.
Changes to program administration.

The Department shall report to the Chairs of the House Committee on Human Services and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare and any interested stakeholders within 30 days after any substantive change in the federal law governing SNAP that:
(a) (1) The Department shall report to the Chairs of the House Committee on Human Services and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare and any interested stakeholders within 30 days after any substantive change in the federal law governing SNAP that:

restricts or improves eligibility;

increases or reduces barriers or creates or eliminates hardships to access; or

inhibits or increases benefit usage.

Within 90 days after a change described pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Department shall provide an analysis to the Chairs of any anticipated administrative costs to the Department and any impacts on SNAP applicants and participants as a result of the change.

The Commissioner may convene a meeting of interested stakeholders to discuss a change listed in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.